Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 5. Financial.

Sec. 21.84.275.
Investments.

A society shall invest its funds only in investments authorized by the laws of this state for the investment of assets of life insurers and subject to the limitations on the investment of assets of life insurers. A foreign or alien society permitted or seeking to do business in this state that invests its funds in accordance with the laws of the state, district, territory, country, or province in which it is incorporated shall meet the requirements of this section for the investment of funds.

History.

(§ 21 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.280.
Prohibited provisions. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.290.
Premiums defined. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Secs. 21.84.300,
21.84.310.
Accident and health insurance and total and permanent disability insurance certificates; reinsurance. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.320.
Funds.

All assets shall be held, invested, and disbursed for the use and benefit of the society, and a member or beneficiary may not have or acquire individual rights or become entitled to an apportionment or the surrender of a part of the assets, except as provided in the benefit contract.

A society may create, maintain, invest, disburse, and apply special funds necessary to carry out a purpose permitted by the laws of the society.

[Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

A society may, under a resolution of its supreme governing body, establish and operate one or more separate accounts and issue contracts on a variable basis, subject to laws regulating life and health insurers establishing those accounts and issuing those contracts. To the extent the society considers it necessary in order to comply with applicable federal or state law, or any rule made under applicable federal or state law, the society may

adopt special procedures for the conduct of the business and affairs of a separate account;

for persons having beneficial interests in the account, provide special voting and other rights, including special rights and procedures relating to investment policy, investment advisory services, selection of certified public accountants, and selection of a committee to manage the business and affairs of the account; and

issue contracts on a variable basis to which AS

21.84.255(b)

and (d) do not apply.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 22, 23, 36 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.330.
Investments. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.335.
Applicability of other code provisions.

Except as provided in this section, societies are governed by this chapter and are exempt from all other provisions of the insurance laws of this state for all purposes, including governmental relations with the state.

In addition to the provisions of this chapter, the following provisions of this title apply to fraternal benefit societies to the extent applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of this chapter and the reasonable implications of this chapter:

AS 21.03;

AS 21.06;

AS

21.09.050

;

AS

21.09.100

;

AS

21.09.200

;

AS

21.09.205

;

AS

21.09.245

;

AS

21.09.247

;

AS 21.18;

AS 21.21;

AS 21.27;

AS 21.33;

AS 21.36;

AS

21.42.290

;

AS

21.42.355

;

AS 21.53;

AS 21.54;

AS 21.56;

AS

21.69.370

;

AS

21.69.640

;

AS 21.78; and

AS

21.96.060

.

History.

(§ 24 ch 96 SLA 1997; am § 88 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in (b)(20) [now (22)] of this section, “AS

21.96.060

” was substituted for “AS 21.89.060” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 21.89.060.

Administrative Code. —

For actuarial opinion and memorandum, see 3 AAC 21, art. 8.

Secs. 21.84.340 — 21.84.390.
Annual statement; annual valuation of certificates; failure to file annual statement; examination of domestic societies; examination of foreign and alien societies; no adverse publications. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.400.
Taxation.

Every society organized or licensed under this chapter is a charitable and benevolent institution, and all of its funds shall be exempt from every state, or other political subdivision, tax other than taxes on real estate and office equipment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)